District of Columbia statutes.
10-105

Power to make and enforce vehicle and traffic regulations.

The Director of the National Park Service is authorized and empowered to make and enforce all regulations for the control of vehicles and traffic, and limiting the speed thereof on roads, highways, and bridges within the public grounds in the District of Columbia, under his control, subject to the penalties prescribed in the Act entitled “An Act regulating the speed of automobiles in the District of Columbia, and for other purposes,” approved June 29, 1906.

June 5, 1920, 41 Stat. 898, ch. 235, § 1

History

1981 Ed., § 8-105.
1973 Ed., § 8-109.

Prior Codifications

The Act entitled “An Act regulating the speed of automobiles in the District of Columbia, and for other purposes,” approved June 29, 1906, referred to at the end of this section, was repealed by the Act of March 3, 1925, 43 Stat. 1125, ch. 446, § 16(a).

References in Text

The functions of the Director of the National Park Service relating to public buildings were transferred to the Federal Works Administrator by § 303 (b) of Reorganization Plan No. I, July 1, 1939, 4 F.R. 2729, 53 Stat. 1427. All functions of all officers of the Department of the Interior (including the Director of the National Park Service) and all functions of all agencies and employees of such Department were, with 2 exceptions, transferred to the Secretary of the Interior, with power vested in him to authorize their performance or the performance of any of his functions by any of such officers, agencies, and employees, by 1950 Reorganization Plan No. 3, §§ 1, 2, 15 F.R. 3174, 64 Stat. 1262. All functions of the Federal Works Agency and of all agencies thereof, together with all functions of the Federal Works Administrator, and all functions of the Commissioner of Public Buildings and the Public Buildings Administration, were transferred to the Administrator of General Services by § 103(a) of the Act of June 30, 1949, 63 Stat. 380, ch. 288. The Federal Works Agency, the Office of Federal Works Administrator, the Office of Commissioner of Public Buildings, and the Public Buildings Administration, were abolished by § 103(b) of said Act. All functions with respect to acquiring space in buildings by lease and all functions with respect to assigning and reassigning space in buildings for use by agencies (including both space acquired by lease and space in government-owned buildings), were, with certain exceptions, transferred from the respective agencies in which theretofore vested to the Administrator of General Services by §  1 of 1950 Reorganization Plan No. 18, 15 F.R. 3177, 64 Stat. 1270.

Transfer of Functions